Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2627
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) There is a lack of licensed child care programs in Nebraska;

(2) Providing incentives and support to the child care workforce will help maintain and increase the child care capacity in Nebraska;

(3) An increased child care capacity will bolster Nebraska's economy by providing parents and guardians the ability to enter, re-enter, and remain in the workforce; and

(4) The benefits of quality child care and early childhood education are indisputable and a connection exists between a child's learning experiences before entering kindergarten and success in school.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 31.